Nevada, session 83, AB259.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 439B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, a person or
entity that purchases a referenced drug in this State shall not pay
a price for the referenced drug that, excluding any fee paid to a
pharmacy for dispensing the referenced drug, is higher than the
maximum fair price for that referenced drug during the price
applicability period.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, a person or
entity that seeks reimbursement for a referenced drug which is
delivered, dispensed or administered to a person in this State shall
not seek reimbursement for the referenced drug at a rate which,
excluding any fee paid to a pharmacy for dispensing the
referenced drug, is higher than the maximum fair price for that
referenced drug during the price applicability period.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, a violation of
subsection 1 or 2 by any person constitutes a deceptive trade
practice for the purposes of NRS 598.0903 to 598.0999, inclusive.
Each such violation of subsection 1 or 2 constitutes a separate
deceptive trade practice.
4. A person who violates the provisions of subsection 1 or 2 is
not subject to any criminal penalty set forth in subsection 3 of
NRS 598.0999.
5. A person aggrieved by a violation of subsection 1 or 2 may
bring an action for consumer fraud pursuant to NRS 41.600.
6. The Department may adopt any regulations necessary to
carry out the provisions of this section.
7. A provider of health coverage for federal employees, a
provider of health coverage that is subject to the Employee
Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 or a Taft-Hartley trust
formed pursuant to 29 U.S.C. § 186(c)(5):
(a) Is not required to comply with the requirements of this
section.
(b) May elect to be subject to the provisions of this section by
notifying the Director in writing on or before January 1 of each
year in which the provider or trust, as applicable, elects to
participate.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Maximum fair price” means the maximum fair price for a
drug published by the United States Secretary of Health and
Human Services pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1320f-4.
(b) “Price applicability period” has the meaning ascribed to it
in 42 U.S.C. § 1320f(b)(2).
(c) “Referenced drug” means a drug subject to a maximum
fair price.
Sec. 2. NRS 41.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41.600 1. An action may be brought by any person who is a
victim of consumer fraud.
2. As used in this section, “consumer fraud” means:
(a) An unlawful act as defined in NRS 119.330;
(b) An unlawful act as defined in NRS 205.2747;
(c) An act prohibited by NRS 482.36655 to 482.36667,
inclusive;
(d) An act prohibited by NRS 482.351;
(e) A deceptive trade practice as defined in NRS 598.0915 to
598.0925, inclusive; [or]
(f) A violation of NRS 417.133 or 417.135 [.] ; or
(g) A violation of section 1 of this act.
3. If the claimant is the prevailing party, the court shall award
the claimant:
(a) Any damages that the claimant has sustained;
(b) Any equitable relief that the court deems appropriate; and
(c) The claimant’s costs in the action and reasonable attorney’s
fees.
4. Any action brought pursuant to this section is not an action
upon any contract underlying the original transaction.
Sec. 3. NRS 598.0999 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598.0999 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 598.0974,
a person who violates a court order or injunction issued pursuant to
the provisions of NRS 598.0903 to 598.0999, inclusive, upon a
complaint brought by the Commissioner, the Director, the district
attorney of any county of this State or the Attorney General shall
forfeit and pay to the State General Fund a civil penalty of not more
than $10,000 for each violation. For the purpose of this section, the
court issuing the order or injunction retains jurisdiction over the
action or proceeding. Such civil penalties are in addition to any
other penalty or remedy available for the enforcement of the
provisions of NRS 598.0903 to 598.0999, inclusive.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 598.0974, in any
action brought pursuant to the provisions of NRS 598.0903 to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
598.0999, inclusive, if the court finds that a person has willfully
engaged in a deceptive trade practice, the Commissioner, the
Director, the district attorney of any county in this State or the
Attorney General bringing the action may recover a civil penalty not
to exceed $15,000 for each violation. The court in any such action
may, in addition to any other relief or reimbursement, award
reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.
3. [A] Except as otherwise provided in section 1 of this act, a
natural person, firm, or any officer or managing agent of any
corporation or association who knowingly and willfully engages in a
deceptive trade practice:
(a) For an offense involving a loss of property or services valued
at $1,200 or more but less than $5,000, is guilty of a category D
felony and shall be punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
(b) For an offense involving a loss of property or services
valued at $5,000 or more but less than $25,000, is guilty of a
category C felony and shall be punished as provided in
NRS 193.130.
(c) For an offense involving a loss of property or services valued
at $25,000 or more but less than $100,000, is guilty of a category B
felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for
a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years, and by a fine of not more than $10,000.
(d) For an offense involving a loss of property or services
valued at $100,000 or more, is guilty of a category B felony and
shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 20 years, and by a fine of not more than $15,000.
(e) For any offense other than an offense described in
paragraphs (a) to (d), inclusive, is guilty of a misdemeanor.
 The court may require the natural person, firm, or officer or
managing agent of the corporation or association to pay to the
aggrieved party damages on all profits derived from the knowing
and willful engagement in a deceptive trade practice and treble
damages on all damages suffered by reason of the deceptive trade
practice.
4. If a person violates any provision of NRS 598.0903 to
598.0999, inclusive, 598.100 to 598.2801, inclusive, 598.405
to 598.525, inclusive, 598.741 to 598.787, inclusive, 598.840 to
598.966, inclusive, or 598.9701 to 598.9718, inclusive, fails to
comply with a judgment or order of any court in this State
concerning a violation of such a provision, or fails to comply with
an assurance of discontinuance or other agreement concerning an
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
alleged violation of such a provision, the Commissioner or the
district attorney of any county may bring an action in the name of
the State of Nevada seeking:
(a) The suspension of the person’s privilege to conduct business
within this State; or
(b) If the defendant is a corporation, dissolution of the
corporation.
 The court may grant or deny the relief sought or may order other
appropriate relief.
5. If a person violates any provision of NRS 228.500 to
228.640, inclusive, fails to comply with a judgment or order of any
court in this State concerning a violation of such a provision, or fails
to comply with an assurance of discontinuance or other agreement
concerning an alleged violation of such a provision, the Attorney
General may bring an action in the name of the State of Nevada
seeking:
(a) The suspension of the person’s privilege to conduct business
within this State; or
(b) If the defendant is a corporation, dissolution of the
corporation.
 The court may grant or deny the relief sought or may order other
appropriate relief.
6. In an action brought by the Commissioner or the Attorney
General pursuant to subsection 4 or 5, process may be served by an
employee of the Consumer Affairs Unit of the Department of
Business and Industry or an employee of the Attorney General.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Property” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 193.0225.
(b) “Services” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 205.0829.
(c) “Value” means the fair market value of the property or
services at the time the deceptive trade practice occurred. The value
of a written instrument which does not have a readily ascertainable
market value is the greater of the face amount of the instrument less
the portion satisfied or the amount of economic loss to the owner of
the instrument resulting from the deprivation of the instrument. The
trier of fact shall determine the value of all other property whose
value is not readily ascertainable, and may, in making that
determination, consider all relevant evidence, including evidence of
the value of the property to its owner.
Sec. 4. The provisions of this act do not apply to any contract
for the sale of or reimbursement for a drug entered into before
January 1, 2026, but do apply to any renewal or extension of such a
contract.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
Sec. 5. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 4, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)